District of Columbia statutes.
48-1121

Distribution of needle or syringe near schools prohibited.

(a)

(1)

Effective 120 days after November 22, 2000, it shall be unlawful for any person to distribute any needle or syringe for the hypodermic injection of any illegal drug in any area of the District of Columbia which is within 1,000 feet of a public or private elementary or secondary school (including a public charter school).

(2)

It is stipulated that based on a survey by the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia that sites at 4th Street Northeast and Rhode Island Avenue Northeast, Southern Avenue Southeast and Central Avenue Southeast, 1st Street Southeast and M Street Southeast, 21st Street Northeast and H Street Northeast, Minnesota Avenue Northeast and Clay Place Northeast, and 15th Street Southeast and Ives Street Southeast are outside the 1,000-foot perimeter. Sites at North Capitol Street and New York Avenue Northeast, Division Avenue Northeast and Foote Street Northeast, Georgia Avenue Northwest and New Hampshire Avenue Northwest, and 15th Street Northeast and A Street Northeast are found to be within the 1,000-foot perimeter.

(b)

The Public Housing Police of the District of Columbia Housing Authority shall prepare a monthly report on activity involving illegal drugs at or near any public housing site where a needle exchange program is conducted, and shall submit such reports to the Executive Director of the District of Columbia Housing Authority, who shall submit them to the Committees on Appropriations of the House of Representatives and Senate. The Executive Director shall ascertain any concerns of the residents of any public housing site about any needle exchange program conducted on or near the site, and this information shall be included in these reports. The District of Columbia Government shall take appropriate action to require relocation of any such program if so recommended by the police or by a significant number of residents of such site.

Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 150

History

1981 Ed., § 33-550.1.

Prior Codifications